Louisiana, session 2026, HB1011.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:3049.2 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3049.2. Nineteenth Judicial District; pilot program; donation Donation of juror per
diem; procedures
A. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person serving
as a juror in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court any judicial district court may
elect to donate their entire juror per diem compensation to the court-appointed
special advocate program (CASA), formally recognized pursuant to Children's Code
Article 424 et seq. an organization that meets either of the following criteria:
(1) Formally recognized under Children's Code Article 424 for its role in
advocating for the best interests of abused and neglected children in the court system.
(2) Specifically designated as the Capital Area Court Appointed Special
Advocates (CASA).
B. The clerk of court for the Nineteenth Judicial District Court judicial
district court shall provide each juror with an option to donate their per diem
compensation to CASA the designated organization as described in Subsection A of
this Section at the time of juror orientation or at another appropriate time during the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1011 ENROLLED
juror service process. The option to donate shall be voluntary and presented in a
manner that ensures informed consent of the juror.
C. The clerk of court shall establish procedures for the collection and timely
distribution of donated per diem compensations to the designated organization
CASA. These procedures shall include provisions for donor acknowledgment and
compliance with financial management standards. A form shall be presented to each
Each person registered for the jury pool which provides shall be provided with a
form that explains the mission of CASA and offers the jurors the voluntary option
to assign all fees due them as a tax-deductible donation to CASA.
D. The pilot program in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court is established
as a voluntary option for jurors to support a court-related nonprofit organization with
the Nineteenth Judicial District Court Jury Office CASA with the judicial district
jury office facilitating the consolidation of individual juror payments into a monthly
payment to CASA. The Juror Office juror office shall send a monthly check to
CASA and provide the list of the names, addresses, and amounts for participating
jurors to allow CASA to mail a tax-deductible receipt for their donation. Information
provided by the Juror Office juror office to CASA shall remain confidential and not
subject to disclosure under the public records law.
E.(1) CASA shall be designated exclusively for donations due to its
court-related advocacy and purpose during the two-year pilot program.
(2) A designated organization receiving donations under this Section CASA
shall utilize the donations exclusively for supporting its mission within the
jurisdiction of the Nineteenth Judicial District.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(6) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1011 ENROLLED
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(6) R.S. 13:1905, 2593, 3049.2, 3715.3, 3715.4, 3734, 4687, 5108.1, 5304,
5366(L)
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.